Hawaii statutes.
§346-9 Workshop program. (a) All
moneys to fund workshop or home labor activities for welfare recipients or
other persons who, in the opinion of the department, would benefit from the
experience, and all moneys for the purchase of materials, machinery, and other
facilities and for the erection, operation, and conduct of the workshops, and
for the payment of compensation, as the department may authorize, shall be
allocated by the legislature through appropriations out of the state general
fund.

(b) The department shall include in its
budgetary request for each upcoming fiscal period, the amounts necessary to
effectuate the purposes of this section.

(c) All moneys received from other funding
sources, including federal sources and all moneys derived from the sale of
products of the workshops or home labor shall be deposited to the credit of the
state general fund. [L 1941, c 296, pt of §1; RL 1945, §4824; RL 1955, §108-4;
am L 1959, c 246, §18; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §14; am L 1963, c 114, §1; HRS
§346-9; am L 1970, c 105, §5; am L 1987, c 339, §4; am L 1993, c 280, §40]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next